src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-TA-mowêw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mowêw - eat him/her : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - p 401; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 79, 103

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nimowâw # SET I
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kimowâw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nimowânân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kimowânaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kimowâwâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nimowâwak # SET I-Pl
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kimowâwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nimowânânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kimowânawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kimowâwâwak

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kimowin # SET II
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kimowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kimowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kimowinâwâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowêw # SET III
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowêwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowêyiwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: mowimêw # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowimêwak # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nimowimâwa # SET IV
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kimowimâwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nimowimânâna
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimowimânawa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kimowimâwâwa





     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-mowâw] # SET I (past)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-mowâw]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-mowânân]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-mowânaw]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-mowâwâw]

     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-mowâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-mowâwak]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-mowânânak]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-mowânawak]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-mowâwâwak]

     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-mowin] # SET II (past)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kikî-mowinân]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kikî-mowinân]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-mowinâwâw]

     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêw] # SET III (past)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêwak]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowêyiwa]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-mowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-mowimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimâwa]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-mowimânâna]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimânawa]
     PV/kî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-mowimâwâwa]





     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-mowâw] # SET I (Fut+Def)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-mowâw]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-mowânân]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-mowânaw]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-mowâwâw]

     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-mowâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Def)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-mowâwak]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-mowânânak]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-mowânawak]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-mowâwâwak]

     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-mowin] # SET II (Fut+Def)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kika-mowinân]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kika-mowinân]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-mowinâwâw]

     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêw] # SET III (Fut+Def)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêwak]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowêyiwa]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-mowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-mowimâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Def)
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimâwa]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-mowimânâna]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimânawa]
     PV/ka+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-mowimâwâwa]




     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-mowâw] # SET I (Fut+Int)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-mowâw]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-mowânân]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-mowânaw]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-mowâwâw]

     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-mowâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Int)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-mowâwak]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-mowânânak]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-mowânawak]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-mowâwâwak]

     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-mowin] # SET II (Fut+Int)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-mowinân]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-mowinân]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-mowinâwâw]

     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêw] # SET III (Fut+Int)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêwak]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowêyiwa]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-mowimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-mowimâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Int)
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimâwa]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-mowimânâna]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimânawa]
     PV/wî+mowêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-mowimâwâwa]




     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nimowik  # SET I inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kimowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO: nimowikonân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kimowikonaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kimowikowâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: [nimowikwak, nimowikowak] # SET I-Pl inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: [kimowikwak, kimowikowak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nimowikonânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwak

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kimowitin # SET II inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kimowitinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kimowitinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kimowitinâwâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [mowik, mowikow] # SET III inv (no 5-3 according to Wolvengrey)
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [mowikwak, mowikowak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowikoyiwa

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nimowikoyiwa # SET IV inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kimowikoyiwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nimowikonâna
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwa

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowak] # SET I
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowat]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyahk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyêk]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowakik] # SET I-Pl
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowacik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyâhkik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyahkok]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyêkok] 
     
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowiyan] # SET II
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-mowiyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowiyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowiyêk]    
     
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowât] # SET III
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowâcik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimât]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâcik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-mowâyit]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimak] # SET IV
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimat]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyahk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowimâyêk]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowit] # SET I inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowisk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêk]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowicik] # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowiskik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhkik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahkok]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêkok]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowitân] # SET II inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowitâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowitâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowitakok]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowikot] # SET III inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowikocik]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-mowikoyit]

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowimit] # SET IV inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowimisk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk]





     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ê-mowak # SET I
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ê-mowat
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyahk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyêk

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ê-mowakik # SET I-Pl
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ê-mowacik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyâhkik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyahkok
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyêkok 

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ê-mowiyan # SET II
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ê-mowiyâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ê-mowiyâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ê-mowiyêk    

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowât # SET III
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowâcik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ê-mowimât
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-mowimâcik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-mowâyit

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowimak # SET IV
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowimat
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowimâyâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowimâyahk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowimâyêk

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: ê-mowit # SET I inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ê-mowisk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ê-mowikoyâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ê-mowikoyahk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ê-mowikoyêk

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: ê-mowicik # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ê-mowiskik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ê-mowikoyâhkik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ê-mowikoyahkok
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ê-mowikoyêkok

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ê-mowitân # SET II inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ê-mowitâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ê-mowitâhk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ê-mowitakok

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ê-mowikot # SET III inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ê-mowikocik
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-mowikoyit

     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ê-mowimit # SET IV inv
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ê-mowimisk
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêk]
     PV/ê+mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk]




     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: mow
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: mowâtân
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: mowihk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: mowâtânik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: mowihkok
